Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.213] HEALTHY AGING AND DEMENTIA EDUCATION. new text end new text begin School districts and charter schools are encouraged to provide instruction on healthy aging and dementia to students in grades 6 through 12 that is aligned with local health standards and integrated into existing programs, curriculum, or the general school environment of a district or charter school. By July 1, 2026, and each even-numbered year thereafter, the commissioner of education, in consultation with the commissioner of health and dementia advocacy organizations, must provide districts and charter schools with age appropriate resources on healthy aging and dementia, including but not limited to strategies to maintain brain health, information on Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia, and caring for an elder with a cognitive impairment. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end